Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.310

Voter registration in state offices, facilities, colleges.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5077.SL) ***

(1) The governor, in consultation with the secretary of state, shall designate agencies to provide voter registration services in compliance with federal statutes.

(2) A federally recognized tribe may request that the governor designate one or more state facilities or state-funded facilities or programs that are located on the lands of the requesting Indian tribe or that are substantially engaged in providing services to Indian tribes, as selected by the tribe, to provide voter registration services. This provision does not alter the state's obligations under the national voter registration act.

(3) Each state agency designated shall provide voter registration services for employees and the public within each office of that agency.

(4) The secretary of state shall design and provide a standard notice informing the public of the availability of voter registration, which notice shall be posted in each state agency where such services are available.

(5) Each institution of higher education shall put in place an active prompt on its course registration website, or similar website that students actively and regularly use, that, if selected, will link the student to the secretary of state's voter registration website. The prompt must ask the student if he or she wishes to register to vote.

[ 2019 c 6 s 4; 2009 c 369 s 19; 2003 c 111 s 222; 2002 c 185 s 3; 1994 c 57 s 10; 1984 c 211 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.07.025.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Intent—1984 c 211: "It is the intention of the legislature, in order to encourage the broadest possible participation in the electoral process by the citizens of the state of Washington, to make voter registration services available in state offices which have significant contact with the public." [ 1984 c 211 s 1.]